Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.011

Name of limited liability company.

The name of each limited liability company as set forth in its certificate of formation must comply with Article 3 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7101; 2015 c 188 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.